Nebraska, session 109, LB247.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 13-2042, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2042 (1) A disposal fee of two dollars one dollar and thirty-four
twenty-five cents is imposed for each six cubic yards of uncompacted solid
waste, two dollars one dollar and thirty-four twenty-five cents for each three
cubic yards of compacted solid waste, or two dollars one dollar and thirty-four
twenty-five cents per ton of solid waste (a) disposed of at landfills regulated
by the department or (b) transported for disposal out of state from a solid
waste processing facility holding a permit under the Integrated Solid Waste
Management Act. Each operator of a landfill or solid waste processing facility
shall make the fee payment quarterly. The fee shall be paid quarterly to the
department on or before the forty-fifth day following the end of each quarter.
For purposes of this section, landfill has the same definition as municipal
solid waste landfill unit in 40 C.F.R. 258.2.
(2) Each fee payment shall be accompanied by a form prepared and furnished
by the department and completed by the permitholder. The form shall state the
total volume of solid waste disposed of at the landfill or transported for
disposal out of state from the solid waste processing facility during the
payment period and shall provide any other information deemed necessary by the
department. The form shall be signed by the permitholder.
(3) If a permitholder fails to make a timely payment of the fee, he or she
shall pay interest on the unpaid amount at the rate specified in section
45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted.
(4) This section shall not apply to a site used solely for the reclamation
of land through the introduction of landscaping rubble or inert material.
(5) Sixty-five Fifty percent of the total of such fees collected in each
quarter shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Integrated
Solid Waste Management Cash Fund and shall be used by the department to cover
the direct and indirect costs of (a) responding to spills or other
environmental emergencies, (b) providing cost share, operation, and maintenance
for remediation of superfund sites in order to pay for nonfederal costs,
including costs for in-kind services, under the federal Comprehensive
Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. 9601
et seq., (c) of regulating, investigating, remediating, and monitoring
facilities during and after operation of facilities, or (d) of performance of
regulated activities under the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, the
Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act, and the Waste Reduction and
Recycling Incentive Act. The department may seek recovery of expenses paid from
the fund for responding to spills or other environmental emergencies or for
investigation, remediation, and monitoring of a facility from any person who
owned, operated, or used the facility in violation of the Integrated Solid
Waste Management Act, the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act, and the
Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act in a civil action filed in the
district court of Lancaster County.
(6)(a) The remaining thirty-five fifty percent of the total of such fees
collected per quarter shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund. For purposes of determining
the total fees collected, any amount of fees rebated pursuant to section
13-2042.01 shall be included as if the fees had not been rebated, and the
amount of the fees rebated pursuant to such section shall be deducted from the
amount to be credited to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund.
(b) From the fees credited to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive
Fund under this subsection:
(i) Grants shall be awarded to counties, municipalities, and agencies for
the purposes of planning and implementing facilities and systems to further the
goals of the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act. The grant proceeds shall
not be used to fund landfill closure site assessments, closure, monitoring, or
investigative or corrective action costs for existing landfills or landfills
already closed prior to July 15, 1992. The council shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out this subdivision. Such rules and regulations
shall base the awarding of grants on a project's reflection of the integrated
solid waste management policy and hierarchy established in section 13-2018, the
proposed amount of local matching funds, and community need; and
(ii) The department may disburse amounts to political subdivisions for
-1-

LB247 LB247
2025 2025
costs incurred in response to and remediation of any solid waste disposed of or
abandoned at dump sites or discrete locations along public roadways or ditches
and on any contiguous area affected by such disposal or abandonment. Such
reimbursement shall be by application to the department on forms prescribed by
the department. The department shall prepare and make available a schedule of
eligible costs and application procedures which may include a requirement of a
demonstration of preventive measures to be taken to discourage future dumping.
The department may not disburse to political subdivisions an amount which in
the aggregate exceeds five percent of total revenue from the disposal fees
collected pursuant to this section in the preceding fiscal year. These
disbursements shall be made on a fiscal-year basis, and applications received
after funds for this purpose have been exhausted may be eligible during the
next fiscal year but are not an obligation of the state. Any eligible costs
incurred by a political subdivision which are not funded due to a lack of funds
shall not be considered an obligation of the state. In disbursing funds under
this subdivision, the director shall make efforts to ensure equal geographical
distribution throughout the state and may deny reimbursements in order to
accomplish this goal.
Sec. 2. Section 66-1519, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
66-1519 (1) There is hereby created the Petroleum Release Remedial Action
Cash Fund to be administered by the department. Revenue from the following
sources shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund:
(a) The fees imposed by sections 66-1520 and 66-1521;
(b) Money paid under an agreement, stipulation, cost-recovery award under
section 66-1529.02, or settlement; and
(c) Money received by the department in the form of gifts, grants,
reimbursements, property liquidations, or appropriations from any source
intended to be used for the purposes of the fund.
(2) Money in the fund may be spent for: (a) Reimbursement for the costs of
remedial action by a responsible person or his or her designated representative
and costs of remedial action undertaken by the department in response to a
release first reported after July 17, 1983, and on or before June 30, 2028,
including reimbursement for damages caused by the department or a person acting
at the department's direction while investigating or inspecting or during
remedial action on property other than property on which a release or suspected
release has occurred; (b) payment of any amount due from a third-party claim;
(c) fee collection expenses incurred by the State Fire Marshal; (d) direct
expenses incurred by the department in carrying out the Petroleum Release
Remedial Action Act; (e) other costs related to fixtures and tangible personal
property as provided in section 66-1529.01; (f) interest payments as allowed by
section 66-1524; (g) claims approved by the State Claims Board authorized under
section 66-1531; (h) the direct and indirect costs incurred by the department
in responding to spills and other environmental emergencies related to
petroleum or petroleum products; and (i) up to one million five hundred
thousand dollars each fiscal year through June 30, 2025, for of the
department's cost-share obligations and operation and maintenance obligations
under the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and
Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. 9601 et seq.
(3) Transfers may be made from the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Cash
Fund to the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(3) (4) Any money in the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Investment earnings on and after April 16, 2024, shall be
credited to the fund.
Sec. 3. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Original section 13-2042, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 66-1519, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-